Massachusetts, session 194th, S915.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 13D of Chapter 118E, as appearing in the Massachusetts General 
Laws 2022 Edition, is hereby amended by striking paragraph 7 and replacing it with the 
following new paragraph 
In establishing rates for nursing pools under section 72Y of chapter 111, the executive 
office shall establish annually the limit for the rate for service provided by nursing pools to 
licensed facilities. The executive office shall establish industry-wide class rates for such services 
and shall establish separate class rates for services provided to nursing facilities and hospitals. 
The executive office shall establish separate rates for registered nurses, licensed practical nurses 
and certified nursing assistants. The executive office may establish rates by geographic region. 
The rates shall include an allowance for wages, payroll taxes and fringe benefits, which shall be 

of 4 11 based upon, and shall not exceed, median wages, payroll taxes and fringe benefits paid to 
permanent medical personnel of the same type at health care facilities in the same geographic 
region. The rates shall also include an allowance for reasonable administrative expenses and a 
reasonable profit factor, as determined by the executive office. The executive office may exempt 
from the rates certain categories, as defined by the executive office, of fixed-term employees that 
work exclusively at a particular health care facility for a period of at least 90 days and for whose 
services there is a contract between a facility and a nursing pool registered with the department 
of public health. The maximum rates shall be no higher than 130% of the average hourly base 
rate for regular registered nurses, licensed practical nurses and certified nursing assistants. The 
executive office shall establish procedures by which nursing pools shall submit cost reports, 
which may be subject to audit, to the executive office to establish rates. The executive office 
shall determine the nursing pool rate contained in this paragraph by considering wage and benefit 
data collected from cost reports received from nursing pools and from health care facilities and 
other relevant information gathered through other collection tools or reasonable methodologies. 
For purposes of quality, accountability and transparency, the executive office shall annually 
ensure that temporary nursing service agencies are (1) meeting their obligation to provide 
temporary personal work consistent with the requirements of the Department of Public Health 
regulation at 105 CMR 157.00 and (2) assigning staff in conformance with Department of Public 
Health regulations, including CMR 105 CMR 157.00. The executive office shall establish a 
Temporary Nursing Service Agency Performance Report Card and make this information 
publicly available on the Internet as a means to increase the reliability of evaluating a temporary 
nursing services agency before a medical provider contracts for its services. The temporary nurse 
services agency shall be responsible for any employees scheduled to work and fail to work due 

of 4 34 by providing replacement staff to ensure that shifts are covered. The Department of Public 
Health shall subject temporary nursing services agency to periodic audits, surveys, and cost 
reports. Temporary nursing service agencies shall not have more than 5 percent in overhead costs 
and shall not make more than 5% in profit. The Performance Report Card shall include, but not 
be limited to: (a) auditing whether the temporary nursing service agencies are adhering to the 
reporting standards of conduct for nurses set forth at 244 CMR 9.03, Standards of Conduct for 
Nurses, and (b) assessing performance of nursing pool personnel assigned to facilities including 
at a minimum: (i) review and response to facility complaints; (ii) record of staff reliability in 
fulfilling assignments; and (iii) policies to establish on-site assessments of staff placed in 
facilities on each assigned shift. The annual report shall also include, at a minimum, the 
following information by geographic area which the health care personnel performed the work 
by facility type of hospital and nursing: (a) The average amount charged by nursing pools for 
health care personnel by license type; (b) The average amount paid by the nursing pool to health 
care personnel by license type; (c) The average amount of labor-related costs paid by the nursing 
pool by health care personnel license type, such as payroll taxes, workers’ compensation 
insurance, professional liability coverage, credentialling, and other employee-related costs. 
SECTION 2. Nursing pools certified under section 72Y of chapter 111 of general laws, or 
any of their affiliated parties, shall be prohibited from soliciting and/or hiring nursing facility 
employees from nursing facilities in which the temporary nurse staffing agency has an active 
contract for the period of the contract plus 12 months. Operators shall under 101 CMR 206 
provided annual reports on their use of temporary nursing service agencies.  
SECTION 3. The Department of Public Health shall amend the “long term care facility 
operating regulations” (105 CMR 150) to require that temp nursing agency workers are 

of 4 57 compliant with all applicable qualifications, and training requirements now required of nursing 
care staff regularly employed in their position. In addition, require temporary nursing service 
agencies pay all fines as assessed by the Department of Public Health or other regulatory body 
generated as a result of assigned agency staff and pertaining to quality of care or documentation 
issues.